District of Columbia statutes.
43-102

Powers to acquire and sell land.

Such persons so associated shall have power to acquire by gift, grant, or purchase any lot or lots of land not exceeding 50 acres, and lay out the same for a burial place for the dead, with convenient aisles, and to sell the same for such purpose and for no other purposes, reserving a sufficient portion thereof for the burial of the stranger and indigent.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 659
1981 Ed., § 27-102.
1973 Ed., § 27-102.